Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5985YH (3) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2426 Section 1. Section 155A.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 17A. âEpinephrine delivery systemâ means a 3 device for immediate self-administration or administration by 4 another trained individual of a measured dose of epinephrine 5 to a person at risk of anaphylaxis, including epinephrine 6 auto-injectors and epinephrine nasal sprays. 7 Sec. 2. Section 155A.46, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 8 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 9 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) An epinephrine delivery system as 10 defined in section 155A.3. 11